New Jersey, session 221, S4433.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The operation of a historic educational program concerning  steam locomotive railroads by a nonprofit organization that has obtained tax-exempt status pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. s.501(c)(3)), or which is a governmental entity, shall not be subject to regulation or inspection by the State as an amusement park, nor shall the operation of a steam locomotive railroad through the program, regardless of the weight of the locomotive, be deemed to be an amusement park ride, if: a.  all personnel operating train equipment have been properly trained in accordance with railroad standards or regulations for the specific duty and level of operations, including, but not limited to,  engineer, fireman, conductor, yard master, dispatcher, and station master; b.  all standard maintenance and operating procedures for the type of equipment being operated, including required inspections by State certified boiler inspectors, are met.  Proof of boiler inspection shall be provided to the Department of Community Affairs, Division of Codes and Standards, in a form and manner as the commissioner shall establish; and c.  the museum shall not offer to the public paid admission to rides on the locomotive railroad or sales of tickets for rides at specific times. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.